Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202681-2,162.01
Act; administration.

The Nebraska Commercial Fertilizer and Beneficial Substances Act shall be administered by the Director of Agriculture.

Laws 1955, c. 334, § 1, p. 1037;

Laws 1975, LB 333, § 1;

Laws 1987, LB 201, § 3;

Laws 2026, LB948, § 12.
March 17, 2026
"Product" under sections 81-2,162.01 to 81-2,162.07, R.R.S.1943, means the product which is sold in the normal course of business to the ultimate consumer, and consists of the finished product. "Manufacture" means manufacture of the finished product. "Distributes" means distribution of the finished product, and not a mere ingredient. PPG Industries Canada LTD v. Kreuscher, 204 Neb. 220, 281 N.W.2d 762 (1979).